src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON X_LAAVU_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^RLEN K ;                      ! láávu lá^RVv^RCu 
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW K ;           ! lávo 
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW K ;           ! lávo 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;                   ! láávu 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;                   ! láávu 
! Note: gen and acc lávo are in 2LAAVU above 
+Sg+Ill:^RLEN%>n K ;                   ! láávun 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;               ! láávust 
+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>ost K ; ! láávoost 
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>in K ;         ! láávoin 
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>oin K ; ! láávooin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;                  ! lávuttáá 
+Sg+Abe+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>ttáá K ;     ! vuárottáá 
+Par:^CLEN^RLEN%>d K ;                 ! láávvud 
+Ess:^CLEN^RLEN%>n K ;                 ! láávvun 
 
 
LEXICON 2LAAVU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;     ! máđuidis 
+N+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;     ! máđuidis 
+N+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;     ! máđuidis 
+N+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;     ! máđuinis 
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NG:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! máđuidiskuin 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2LAAVU_PL_DIM ; ! 
+N: X_LAAVU_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_LAAVU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ;                ! lávoh 
+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>h K ;        ! lávoh 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN%>i5 K ;        ! láávui 
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>i5 K ;                    ! lávui 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>i5 K ;       ! lávoi 
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id K ;  ! láávoid 
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;               ! láávuid 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id K ;         ! láávoid 
+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>oid K ; ! láávooid 
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in K ;               ! láávuin 
+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>in K ;       ! lávoin 
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>i GUIN ; 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ; 
+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá K ; 
+Pl+Abe+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>ittáá K ; 
 
 
 
LEXICON 2VUAGGU !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2VUAGGU_SG ; 
2VUAGGU_PL ; 
 
 
!LEXICON X_VUAGGU !!≈ * ''@CODE@'' 
!X_VUAGGU_SG ; 
!X_JUUHA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2VUAGGU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_VUAGGU_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:s CPXsuff ; 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_SG_DIM ; 
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
LEXICON 2VUAGGU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_JUUHA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! vuáguidis 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_PL_DIM ; 
 
 
LEXICON X_VUAGGU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;                   ! vuággu 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;           ! vuágu check 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;           ! vuágu 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;       ! vuágun 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;       ! vuágust 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in K ; ! vuággoin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá K ;     ! vuáguttáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;                   ! vuággun 
+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;             ! vuággun 
+Par:%>d K ;                   ! vuággud 
 
 
LEXICON 2KUSSA !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2ALGA ; 
 
LEXICON 2KUSSA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2PUUVSAH_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2VADDU !!≈ * **@CODE@** 2AIGI has EA for Sg+Ill, 2SOLLA has RLEN for Sg+Com and Pl+Ill 
2VADDU_SG ; 
2VADDU_PL ; 
 
!LEXICON X_VADDU !!≈ * ''@CODE@'' 2AIGI has EA for Sg+Ill, 2SOLLA has RLEN for Sg+Com and Pl+Ill 
!X_ALGA_SG ; 
!X_ALGA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2VADDU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2ALGA_SG ; 
 
LEXICON 2VADDU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2PUUVSAH_PL2_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIVE ; ! xxx ???
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_PL_DIM ; 
 
 
!LEXICON 2TAALU2 !!≈ * ''@CODE@'' one variant for Pl+Gen, plus 2VUARU 
!+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^SVLOW%>i K ;        ! tááloi 
!2VUARU ; 
 
 
 
LEXICON 2TAVLU !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2TAVLU_SG ; 
2TAVLU_PL ; 
 
!LEXICON X_TAVLU   * ''@CODE@'' 
!X_TAVLU_SG ; 
!X_TAVLU_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2TAVLU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_TAVLU_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Com:%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_SG_DIM ; 
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2TAVLU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_TAVLU_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_PL_DIM ; 
 
 
LEXICON X_TAVLU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;               ! lanttu 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;       ! laantu 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;       ! laantu 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;   ! laantun 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;   ! laantust 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;           ! lanttuin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;      ! lantuttáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;               ! lanttun 
+Par:%>d K ;               ! kissád 
 
LEXICON X_TAVLU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ;  ! laantuh 
+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;         ! lanttuid 
 X_WG_RLEN_PL_Loc ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2NIISU !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
2NIISU_SG ; 
2NIISU_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2NIISU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_NIISU_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RVSH VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RVSH VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG^RVSH%>st CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>n CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_SG_DIM ; 
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2NIISU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_NIISU_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RVSH%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2VADDU_PL_DIM ; 

 
LEXICON X_NIISU_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;               ! niisu 
+Sg+Gen: K ;               ! niisu 
+Sg+Acc: K ;               ! niisu 
+Sg+Ill:%>n K ;            ! niisun 
+Sg+Loc:%>st K ;           ! niisust 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;           ! niisuin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá K ; ! nisuttáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;               ! niisun 
+Par:%>d K ;               ! niisud 
+Ess+Err/Orth:^CLEN%>n K ; ! kiillun 
+Par+Err/Orth:^CLEN%>d K ; ! kiillud 
 
 
LEXICON X_NIISU_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:%>h K ;  ! niisuh 
+Pl+Gen:%>i K ; 
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>i K ; 
+Pl+Acc:%>id K ; 
+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;     ! niisuid 
+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;     ! niisuid 
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>iguin K ; 
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>igijn K ; 
+Pl+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ittáá K ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2VAALJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** vaaljâ
2VAALJA_SG ; 
2VAALJA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2VAALJA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** vaaljâ : va^RVljâ
+N:  X_VAALJA_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:^RVSH%>s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^RVSH%>st CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Ess:^RVSH%>n CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2JUUHA_SG_DIM ; !kaandâš nieidâš tuulâš XXX
+N: Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
 
