src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
spavah+Sem/Dummytag:spavâ 2VADDU_PL "" ;
smááhuh+Sem/Dummytag:smá^RVkk4u 2VADDU_PL "" ;
kirhomiänuh+Sem/Dummytag:kirho#miän^RCu 2LAAVU_PL "" ;
turbeskuáppu+Sem/Dummytag:turbe#skuáppu 2VUAGGU "" ;
univormu+Sem/Dummytag:uni#vo^RVrmu 2TAVLU "" ;
virgerijjâ+Sem/Dummytag:virge#ri^RVjjâ 2KUSSA "virkavapaa" ;
selgisááhá+Sem/Tool:selgi#sááh5á 2NIISU "selkäsaha" ;
ryevdisááhá+Sem/Tool:ryevdi#sááh5á 2NIISU "rautasaha" ;
moottorsááhá+Sem/Tool:moottor#sááh5á 2NIISU "moottorisaha" ;
čuággumsááhá+Sem/Tool:čuággum#sááh5á 2NIISU "pistosaha" ;
válkká+Sem/Dummytag:vá^RVlkk4á 2VADDU "vatsaosa porolla" ;
purrâmâšjuávkku+Sem/Dummytag:purrâmâš#juávkk4u 2VUAGGU "ruokakunta" ;
luoddâkolbâ+Sem/Dummytag:luoddâ#ko^RVlbâ 2KUSSA "tienviitta" ;
mučisvuođâváddu+Sem/Dummytag:mučis#vuođâ#vá^RVddu 2VADDU "kauneusvirhe" ;
etikaastâ+Sem/Dummytag:eti#kaastâ 2VAALJA "hätäkaste" ;
sriijtâ+Sem/Dummytag:srii4jt^RCâ 2VAALJA "sprii" ;
rytmâ+Sem/Dummytag:ry^RVtmâ 2KUSSA "rytmi" ;
koldâsááhá+Sem/Dummytag:koldâ#sááh5á 2NIISU "justeeri" ;
näpikiärdu+Sem/Dummytag:näpi#kiärdu 2VUAGGU "napapiiri" ;
algâkurssâ+Sem/Dummytag:algâ#ku^RVrssâ 2KUSSA "alkeiskurssi" ;
luáttukorttâ+Sem/Dummytag:luáttu#ko^RVrttâ 2KUSSA "luottokortti" ;
ergikunâgâsvuájuh+Sem/Dummytag:ergi#kunâgâs#vuáj^RCu 2LAAVU_PL "porokuninkuusajo" ;
postâovdâmáksu+Sem/Dummytag:postâ#ovdâ#má^RVk4s^RCu 2VADDU "postiennakko" ;
eennâmpállu+Sem/Dummytag:eennâm#pá^RVllu 2VADDU "maapallo" ;
kietâpállu+Sem/Dummytag:kietâ#pá^RVllu 2VADDU "käsipallo" ;
uksâkiällu+Sem/Dummytag:uksâ#kiällu 2VUAGGU "ovikello" ;
stággu+Sem/Dummytag:stá^RVggu 2VADDU "korento" ;
uđđâsistkiävttu+Sem/Dummytag:uđđâsist#kiävttu 2VUAGGU "uudelleenkäyttö" ;
viermicuozzâ+Sem/Dummytag:viermi#cuozzâ 2KUSSA "verkkokalvo" ;
áššu+Sem/Dummytag:á^RVššu 2VADDU "hiillos" ;
pááluh+Sem/Dummytag:pá^RVllu 2VADDU_PL "kivekset" ;
čiähuliinsah+Sem/Dummytag:čiähu#li^RVnssâ 2KUSSA_PL "piilolinssit" ;
kirkkomiänuh+Sem/Dummytag:kirkko#miän^RCu 2LAAVU_PL "kirkonmenot" ;
intensiivuápuh+Sem/Dummytag:intensiiv#uáppu  2VUAGGU_PL "aineopinnot" ;
amnâsuápuh+Sem/Dummytag:amnâs#uáppu 2VUAGGU_PL "aineopinnot" ;
šiäštuh+Sem/Dummytag:šiäštu 2VUAGGU_PL "säästöt" ;
hakku+Sem/Tool:ha^RVkku 2TAVLU "hakku" ;
cimccâhtavlu+Sem/Dummytag:cimccâh#ta^RVvlu 2TAVLU "helmitaulu" ;
vivlu+Sem/Tool-music:vi^RVvlu 2TAVLU "viulu" ;
suovâmiärkká+Sem/Dummytag:suovâ#miärkk4á 2VUAGGU "savusumu" ;
sijđovavnu+Sem/Dummytag:sijđo#va^RVvnu 2TAVLU "sivuvaunu" ;
nommâlappu+Sem/Dummytag:nommâ#la^RVppu 2TAVLU "lappu" ;
pamppu+Sem/Dummytag:pa^RVmppu 2TAVLU "pamppu" ;
lasemáksu+Sem/Dummytag:lase#má^RVk4s^RCu 2VADDU "lisämaksu" ;
heeilâ+Sem/Dummytag:heei4lâ 2VAALJA ;
leeilâ+Sem/Dummytag:leei4lâ 2VAALJA ;
peeilâ+Sem/Dummytag:peei4lâ 2VAALJA ;
puđkkâ+Sem/Dummytag:pu^RVđkk4â 2KUSSA ;
kuoblâ+Sem/Dummytag:kuoblâ 2KUSSA ;
reppu+Sem/Dummytag:re^RVppu 2TAVLU ;
kaaljâ+v2+Sem/Dummytag:ka^RVljâ 2VAALJA ; ! equal to vaaljâ
aalmugpeivituáluh+Sem/Event:aalmug#peivi#tuál^RCu 2LAAVU_PL ;
pessijâštuáluh+Sem/Event:pessijâš#tuál^RCu 2LAAVU_PL ; ! tags_via_apertium
fievridemskiijpâ+Sem/Veh:fievridem#skii4jpâ 2VAALJA "kuljetusalus" ;
fiskistiälkku+Sem/Plant:fiskis#tiälkk4u 2VUAGGU "keltatäplä" ;
haalu+Sem/Perc-emo:haalu 2NIISU "halu" ;	!YAML tags_via_apertium
kaastâ+Sem/Event:ka^RVstâ 2VAALJA "kaste" ; !¢kastáin, kaastâst, kaastân, kaastâ tags_via_apertium
kiijlu+Sem/Measr:kiijlu 2NIISU "kilo" ;
koskâijjâ+Sem/Time:koskâ#i^RVjjâ 2KUSSA "keskiyö" ; ! tags_via_apertium
kuosâleibiruávsku+Sem/Plant-fungus:kuosâ#leibi#ruávsku 2VUAGGU "kuusenleppärousku" ;
kurkku+Sem/Fruit:ku^RVrkku 2TAVLU "kurkku" ;
kákku+Sem/Food:ká^RVkk4u 2VADDU "rieska" ;	! tags_via_apertium
messu+Sem/Event:me^RVssu 2TAVLU "messu" ;	! tags_via_apertium
peesileibiruávsku+Sem/Plant-fungus:peesi#leibi#ruávsku 2VUAGGU "männynleppärousku" ;
piiru+Sem/Hum:piir^RCu 2NIISU "piru" ;	!YAML tags_via_apertium
sajanmáksu+Sem/Money:sajan#má^RVk4s^RCu 2VADDU "perusmaksu" ; ! tags_via_apertium
spihâpiärgu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Food:spihâ#piärgu 2VUAGGU "suolaliha" ;
sááhá+Sem/Tool:sááh5á 2NIISU "saha" ;	!YAML tags_via_apertium
tavehäldeelukkâ+Sem/Plant:tavehäldee#lu^RVkk4â 2KUSSA "pohjannoidanlukko" ;
vaaljâ+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Event:va^RVljâ 2VAALJA "vaali" ; !¢valjáin, vaaljâst, vaaljân, vaaljâ tags_via_apertium
ávutuáluh+Sem/Event:ávu#tuál^RCu 2LAAVU_PL "juhlallisuudet" ;
